ukrainian/test2.aff
SET UTF-8
NEEDAFFIX ~

SFX A Y 106
SFX A м й .
SFX A й м .
SFX A х ми .
SFX A я ь .
SFX A ь я .
SFX A ми м .
SFX A у а .
SFX A а у .
SFX A е і .
SFX A і е .
SFX A ою у .
SFX A ї ю .
SFX A го му .
SFX A мо те .
SFX A ш те .
SFX A ів ами .
SFX A ло вши .
SFX A ли вши .
SFX A ти вши .
SFX A вши ла .
SFX A є ю .
SFX A ки ку .
SFX A ню ням .
SFX A но ні .
SFX A ав ала .
SFX A тю ть .
SFX A ко ку .
SFX A ок ками .
SFX A чи ть .
SFX A ую увавши .
SFX A ію ією .
SFX A єю ю .
SFX A т тові .
SFX A н ні .
SFX A ни ну .
SFX A р рові .
SFX A ри рами .
SFX A цю цями .
SFX A аю аємо .
SFX A ею і .
SFX A ив ила .
SFX A во ві .
SFX A ч чеві .
SFX A юю ювавши .
SFX A с сові .
SFX A ик і .
SFX A ви ву .
SFX A ди дами .
SFX A д ді .
SFX A л лові .
SFX A то ті .
SFX A си сами .
SFX A г гові .
SFX A з зу .
SFX A лю лі .
SFX A ув ула .
SFX A ги гами .
SFX A зи зами .
SFX A ро рі .
SFX A яв яла .
SFX A яю яємо .
SFX A їв єві .
SFX A пи пами .
SFX A п пами .
SFX A до ді .
SFX A би бу .
SFX A хи ху .
SFX A ж жу .
SFX A ф фові .
SFX A фи фами .
SFX A б бами .
SFX A щ щами .
SFX A рю ривши .
SFX A ов у .
SFX A зо зі .
SFX A хо ха .
SFX A ук енкові .
SFX A 'ю 'ям .
SFX A бо бі .
SFX A юк і .
SFX A по пами .
SFX A ік ічного .
SFX A со су .
SFX A жи жіть .
SFX A тв ькими .
SFX A чю чям .
SFX A як і .
SFX A дю ді .
SFX A сю сі .
SFX A кши катимем .
SFX A ак у .
SFX A гши гатимем .
SFX A ц цові .
SFX A ию ий .
SFX A ґ ґові .
SFX A ськ щами .
SFX A жю жям .
SFX A зши затимем .
SFX A хши хнувши .
SFX A ек еці .
SFX A щи щімо .
SFX A ьо і .
SFX A сши с .
SFX A рши рти .
SFX A ци ці .
SFX A фо фа .

SFX B Y 133
SFX B м ми .
SFX B ся сь .
SFX B сь ся .
SFX B х м .
SFX B ми х .
SFX B у і .
SFX B і у .
SFX B е у .
SFX B а ою .
SFX B ою а .
SFX B ого ому .
SFX B ій ими .
SFX B ої ими .
SFX B ий ому .
SFX B ш мо .
SFX B мо ш .
SFX B ів ах .
SFX B ли ла .
SFX B ло ла .
SFX B ти те .
SFX B вши ло .
SFX B ки ка .
SFX B ню ні .
SFX B ня ні .
SFX B ть сь .
SFX B є й .
SFX B но ну .
SFX B ав али .
SFX B істю ості .
SFX B ко ка .
SFX B к кові .
SFX B ючи ють .
SFX B уй увавши .
SFX B ії ією .
SFX B ія ією .
SFX B ію іє .
SFX B ую увала .
SFX B єю я .
SFX B н ну .
SFX B нь ннями .
SFX B т ті .
SFX B р рі .
SFX B ри рам .
SFX B ни ні .
SFX B цю ці .
SFX B ця ці .
SFX B ай авши .
SFX B аю аєте .
SFX B ею е .
SFX B ив ило .
SFX B во ву .
SFX B ць цями .
SFX B ч чем .
SFX B ей ями .
SFX B юй ювавши .
SFX B юю ювала .
SFX B ви ві .
SFX B с сом .
SFX B д дові .
SFX B ди ду .
SFX B л лом .
SFX B то ту .
SFX B з зі .
SFX B г гу .
SFX B си сам .
SFX B ув ули .
SFX B лю лять .
SFX B ги гам .
SFX B ль лі .
SFX B зи зу .
SFX B ля лі .
SFX B ро ру .
SFX B яв яли .
SFX B яю яєте .
SFX B яй явши .
SFX B їв ями .
SFX B п пу .
SFX B пи пам .
SFX B до ду .
SFX B ячи ять .
SFX B би бами .
SFX B хи хами .
SFX B ф фами .
SFX B фи фові .
SFX B б бу .
SFX B тя ті .
SFX B ж же .
SFX B щ щам .
SFX B ов ом .
SFX B рю римо .
SFX B зо зу .
SFX B ря реві .
SFX B хо ху .
SFX B еї ею .
SFX B 'ї 'ям .
SFX B 'ю 'ї .
SFX B 'я 'ї .
SFX B бо бу .
SFX B ея еї .
SFX B дь дять .
SFX B очи отавши .
SFX B аї аєві .
SFX B по пі .
SFX B со сі .
SFX B жи жімо .
SFX B тв ького .
SFX B учи ете .
SFX B чю чі .
SFX B ттю ті .
SFX B ачи итимуть .
SFX B чя чі .
SFX B дю дям .
SFX B дя ді .
SFX B ая аєві .
SFX B сю ся .
SFX B кши катимеш .
SFX B гши гатимеш .
SFX B ц цом .
SFX B уго узі .
SFX B зь зивши .
SFX B ию иватиме .
SFX B зши затимеш .
SFX B ґ ґом .
SFX B жю жі .
SFX B жя жі .
SFX B аго азі .
SFX B ой ою .
SFX B щи щіть .
SFX B ьо ю .
SFX B хши хнімо .
SFX B сши сла .
SFX B ци цу .
SFX B рши рла .

SFX C Y 148
SFX C м х .
SFX C у е .
SFX C а і .
SFX C і а .
SFX C ю ї .
SFX C их ими .
SFX C е ому .
SFX C ї му .
SFX C ій ому .
SFX C ими ому .
SFX C ого ими .
SFX C ий ого .
SFX C ах ами .
SFX C ами ах .
SFX C ись и .
SFX C ось о .
SFX C ося о .
SFX C тесь мось .
SFX C теся мось .
SFX C мо тесь .
SFX C ів ам .
SFX C ться мось .
SFX C шся мось .
SFX C ло ли .
SFX C ли ло .
SFX C ти ло .
SFX C ися и .
SFX C вши ли .
SFX C ях ями .
SFX C ш ться .
SFX C ями ях .
SFX C ки ками .
SFX C ня ню .
SFX C ть ся .
SFX C є ють .
SFX C но на .
SFX C всь вшись .
SFX C вся вшись .
SFX C лась вшись .
SFX C лася вшись .
SFX C ав ало .
SFX C мся мось .
SFX C ко ки .
SFX C усь еться .
SFX C уся еться .
SFX C йсь йтесь .
SFX C йся йтесь .
SFX C юсь ються .
SFX C юся ються .
SFX C ок кам .
SFX C ючи ємо .
SFX C ія ію .
SFX C уй увала .
SFX C т том .
SFX C нь нням .
SFX C н нові .
SFX C р ру .
SFX C ри рах .
SFX C ця цю .
SFX C ни нами .
SFX C ай ають .
SFX C ив или .
SFX C во ва .
SFX C ч чу .
SFX C ць цях .
SFX C ей ям .
SFX C юй ювала .
SFX C ик ого .
SFX C ви вою .
SFX C с су .
SFX C д ду .
SFX C ди дам .
SFX C л лі .
SFX C то та .
SFX C з зові .
SFX C си сах .
SFX C ув уло .
SFX C г гом .
SFX C ги гах .
SFX C ля лю .
SFX C зи зі .
SFX C ль леві .
SFX C ро ра .
SFX C яв яло .
SFX C яй яємо .
SFX C їв ю .
SFX C п пі .
SFX C пи пах .
SFX C до да .
SFX C іми ього .
SFX C іх ього .
SFX C ячи итимуть .
SFX C би бі .
SFX C ф фом .
SFX C хи хам .
SFX C фи фам .
SFX C б бі .
SFX C тя тю .
SFX C щ щах .
SFX C ж жі .
SFX C зо за .
SFX C ов а .
SFX C хо хи .
SFX C ря рем .
SFX C ук енком .
SFX C 'я 'ю .
SFX C ея ею .
SFX C бо ба .
SFX C юк енкові .
SFX C дь димо .
SFX C очи отала .
SFX C ік ічному .
SFX C по па .
SFX C со са .
SFX C тв ькому .
SFX C учи емо .
SFX C ачи итимемо .
SFX C жи жім .
SFX C чя чю .
SFX C жся жтесь .
SFX C дя дю .
SFX C дься дяться .
SFX C як у .
SFX C зми стами .
SFX C чся чмось .
SFX C ая аєм .
SFX C ух усі .
SFX C ак і .
SFX C кши катиме .
SFX C рся рившись .
SFX C гши гатиме .
SFX C гся гшись .
SFX C лься лившись .
SFX C ц ці .
SFX C нься неться .
SFX C ськ щем .
SFX C зь зила .
SFX C жя жю .
SFX C ґ ґу .
SFX C зши затиме .
SFX C ьо я .
SFX C хши хніть .
SFX C ох ом .
SFX C щи щім .
SFX C сши сли .
SFX C ой оєві .
SFX C кся кшись .
SFX C рши рли .

SFX D Y 215
SFX D у ою .
SFX D ім ому .
SFX D им ому .
SFX D і ими .
SFX D а ими .
SFX D ою ими .
SFX D е ого .
SFX D ї го .
SFX D ій ого .
SFX D их ого .
SFX D ими ого .
SFX D ий ими .
SFX D ого ім .
SFX D ом ові .
SFX D ах ам .
SFX D ам ах .
SFX D ами у .
SFX D тесь мося .
SFX D теся мося .
SFX D мось тесь .
SFX D мося тесь .
SFX D мо теся .
SFX D ів ові .
SFX D ям ю .
SFX D ться мося .
SFX D шся мося .
SFX D ло ти .
SFX D ти ли .
SFX D ли ти .
SFX D вши ти .
SFX D ш мось .
SFX D ях ям .
SFX D ню ня .
SFX D уть емо .
SFX D ки ках .
SFX D ем у .
SFX D є ємо .
SFX D ють ємо .
SFX D ями ю .
SFX D но ними .
SFX D лись вшись .
SFX D лися вшись .
SFX D лось вшись .
SFX D лося вшись .
SFX D тись вшись .
SFX D тися вшись .
SFX D ав ати .
SFX D ась ось .
SFX D ася ись .
SFX D всь лась .
SFX D вся лась .
SFX D ість ості .
SFX D істю ости .
SFX D вшись лась .
SFX D мся мося .
SFX D ко ці .
SFX D усь емось .
SFX D уся емось .
SFX D йсь йтеся .
SFX D йся йтеся .
SFX D юсь ємось .
SFX D юся ємось .
SFX D ок ках .
SFX D ння тимуть .
SFX D ючи єте .
SFX D ію ії .
SFX D ія ії .
SFX D уй ували .
SFX D ую ували .
SFX D єю ї .
SFX D чись ться .
SFX D т тами .
SFX D нь ннях .
SFX D р рами .
SFX D н ном .
SFX D ри ру .
SFX D цю ця .
SFX D аю аймо .
SFX D ай аємо .
SFX D ить имо .
SFX D ни на .
SFX D іть імо .
SFX D ею ями .
SFX D ив ити .
SFX D ця цею .
SFX D ять ить .
SFX D ць цям .
SFX D ч чі .
SFX D ей ях .
SFX D юй ювали .
SFX D юю ювали .
SFX D ик ому .
SFX D с сі .
SFX D ви ва .
SFX D ди дах .
SFX D д дом .
SFX D л лу .
SFX D єм єві .
SFX D си сові .
SFX D ув ути .
SFX D з зом .
SFX D то ти .
SFX D тво ькими .
SFX D г гами .
SFX D лю леві .
SFX D ги гу .
SFX D зи зам .
SFX D ать ить .
SFX D ль лю .
SFX D ро ри .
SFX D яв яти .
SFX D яю явши .
SFX D яй яєте .
SFX D ля леві .
SFX D їв ям .
SFX D нись ніться .
SFX D нися ніться .
SFX D п пові .
SFX D зм стами .
SFX D пи пу .
SFX D іми ьому .
SFX D іх ьому .
SFX D до ди .
SFX D ячи итимемо .
SFX D би бах .
SFX D хи хах .
SFX D ф фі .
SFX D фи фах .
SFX D б бам .
SFX D рю рите .
SFX D щ щем .
SFX D ж жеві .
SFX D зо зи .
SFX D иня ами .
SFX D ов івкою .
SFX D хо сі .
SFX D ря рі .
SFX D 'ю 'я .
SFX D чися чіться .
SFX D бо би .
SFX D ук енка .
SFX D дь дите .
SFX D ея ей .
SFX D юк енком .
SFX D рись рімось .
SFX D рися рімось .
SFX D ливо нім .
SFX D рня рень .
SFX D дись дімось .
SFX D дися дімось .
SFX D очи отали .
SFX D ік ічними .
SFX D по пу .
SFX D учи уть .
SFX D тв ькій .
SFX D со си .
SFX D ачи итимете .
SFX D чю чя .
SFX D ттю те .
SFX D жся жтеся .
SFX D тя нім .
SFX D дю дя .
SFX D ово ами .
SFX D ьня ень .
SFX D шися шімось .
SFX D жи жу .
SFX D дься димось .
SFX D зми стові .
SFX D як а .
SFX D чся чмося .
SFX D їть ївши .
SFX D ая аї .
SFX D 'я ного .
SFX D сись сіться .
SFX D сися сіться .
SFX D жись жіться .
SFX D жися жіться .
SFX D пись пляться .
SFX D пися пляться .
SFX D вись вімось .
SFX D вися вімось .
SFX D сю сям .
SFX D кши катиму .
SFX D гши гатиму .
SFX D чя ного .
SFX D літня річними .
SFX D рся рилась .
SFX D ак енкові .
SFX D ц цу .
SFX D нься нуться .
SFX D еня ам .
SFX D ию иватиму .
SFX D лься лилась .
SFX D мись мімось .
SFX D мися мімось .
SFX D иськ ищами .
SFX D зь зили .
SFX D гшись гся .
SFX D жю жя .
SFX D зши затиму .
SFX D бись бімось .
SFX D бися бімось .
SFX D дя ного .
SFX D ґ гові .
SFX D гся гши .
SFX D хши хнемо .
SFX D ьо іми .
SFX D ух унові .
SFX D сши сло .
SFX D ох ома .
SFX D ой ої .
SFX D вня вень .
SFX D рши рло .
SFX D ршись ртись .
SFX D щи щу .
